Alaska statutes. Title 34. Property.
Article 5. Transportation, Storage, and Agistment.

Sec. 34.35.220.
Persons entitled to carrier, warehouse, and livestock liens.

The following persons have liens on personal property for their just and reasonable charges for the labor, care, and attention provided and the food furnished, and may retain possession of the property until the charges are paid:

a person who is a common carrier, or who, at the request of the owner or lawful possessor of personal property, transports the property from one place to another;

a person who safely keeps or stores personal property at the request of the owner or lawful possessor of the property; and

a person who pastures or feeds livestock, or bestows labor, care, or attention on the livestock at the request of the owner or lawful possessor of the livestock.

History.

(§ 26-4-1 ACLA 1949; am § 4 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For towing and storage lien on motor vehicles, see AS

28.10.502

.

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009.

Sec. 34.35.225.
Sale to enforce lien.

If just and reasonable charges are not paid within three months after the care, attention, and labor is performed or food is furnished, the person having the lien may proceed to sell at public auction, as provided in AS

34.35.175

, the property mentioned in AS

34.35.220

, or a part of it, sufficient to pay the just and reasonable charges.

Nothing in this section may be construed to authorize a person to sell more of the property than is sufficient to pay charges due the person on the property.

A person who sells, loans, or otherwise disposes of property contrary to the provisions of AS

34.35.220

and this section without the consent of the owner of the property shall, for each offense, forfeit and pay to the owner a sum equal to the market value of the property, and 50 percent of the market value in addition as a penalty. In this subsection, “market value” means the price the property bears at the time the owner makes demand on the person for it.

The remedies available under this section are in addition to any remedies available under AS

45.07.210

.

History.

(§ 26-4-2 ACLA 1949; am §§ 5 — 7 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009.